Washington statutes.
RCW 22.32.010

Warehouse operator or carrier refusing to issue receipt.

Every person or corporation, and every officer, agent and employee thereof, receiving any goods, wares or merchandise, for sale or on commission, for storage, carriage or forwarding, who, having an opportunity to inspect the same, shall fail or refuse to deliver to the owner thereof a receipt duly signed, bearing the date of issuance, describing the goods, wares or merchandise received and the quantity, quality and condition thereof, and specifying the terms and conditions upon which they are received, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1909 c 249 s 391; RRS s 2643.]